bibisco/dictionaries/es_MX/es_MX.dic
abanderizar/PRSTVWX
abastecer/IOQRTWX
abnegar/HPRSTWX
aborrecer/INOQRTWX
abrochar/IPRSTVWX
acabalar/PSVWX
acalambrar/PRSVWX
acapullar/PRSVWX
acecinar/IPSVWX
acevilar/PSVWX
achispar/PRSTVWX
aclarecer/WX
acolitar/PSVWX
acordar/PRSTWX
acreditar/PRSTVWX
acuartillar/PSVWX
adamar/LPSVWX
adherir/OQWYZ
adoquinar/PSVWX
adulterar/HLPSVWX
aferrojar/PSVWX
afrenillar/PSVWX
agauchar/PRSTVWX
agomerar/PSVWX
aguazar/PSVWX
ahervar/PSVWX
ahusar/PSWX
ajuntar/PSVWX
albeldar/PSVWX
alcayatar/PSVWX
alfabetizar/HPSVWX
alienar/HLPRSTVWX
allanar/IPRSTVWX
alparcear/PSVWX
aludir/QTVWX
amaitinar/PSVWX
amaniatar/PSVWX
amartillar/PSVWX
amerar/PSVWX
amojamar/IPRSTVWX
amortajar/IPSVWX
amurallar/PSVWX
anchoar/PSVWX
animar/HPRSTVWX
antojar/PRSVWX
apalabrar/PSVWX
aparejar/IPRSTVWX
apedrear/IPRSTVWX
apergaminar/PRSVWX
aplanar/IPRSTVWX
apologizar/PSVWX
apoyar/PRSTUVWX
apunchar/PSVWX
arborizar/HPSTVWX
armonizar/HPSVWX
arramplar/PSVWX
arremeter/IVWX
arrocinar/PRSTVWX
asaetear/PSVWX
asentar/IPRSTWX
asolanar/PSVWX
asumir/OQRTVWX
atalantar/PSVWX
atemperar/HLPSVWX
atinar/PSVWX
atosigar/IPRSTVWX
atreudar/PSVWX
aturdir/IOQRTVWX
autentificar/PSVWX
avenir/IOQWY
avispedar/PSVWX
azoar/PSVWX
bachear/PSVWX
balar/LPSVWX
balsear/PSVWX
barbear/PSVWX
barquear/PSVWX
bastantear/PSVWX
bautizar/PRSTVWX
besucar/PSTVWX
bizcochar/PSVWX
bloquear/LPRSTUVWX
bonificar/HPSVWX
borrachear/PSVWX
brechar/PSVWX
brujear/PSVWX
burrajear/PSVWX
cabestrar/LPSVWX
cachear/PSVWX
calandrar/PSVWX
calimbar/PSVWX
campanillear/PSVWX
cantear/PSVWX
captar/HPRSTVWX
carcajear/PRSVWX
cartear/PRSVWX
castellanizar/PSVWX
cazoletear/PSVWX
cencerrear/PSVWX
cernear/PSVWX
chamarilear/PSVWX
chapotear/PSVWX
chascar/PSVWX
chismear/PSVWX
chochear/PSVWX
churruscar/PSVWX
circunscribir/OQRTVWXY
clarear/PRSTVWX
coadyuvar/LPSVWX
codear/PRSVWX
colear/PSVWX
columbrar/PSVWX
compadecer/OQRTWX
complacer/ILOQRTWX
concatenar/HPRSTUVWX
concordar/HPSWX
confinar/HILPRSTVWX
congojar/PSVWX
conseguir/IOQWYZ
constar/LPSVWX
contar/LPRSTUWX
contraer/OQWY
contrapechar/PSVWX
convencer/IOQRTVWX
copar/APSVWX
corporificar/PSVWX
cosificar/HPSVWX
coyotear/PSTVWX
cristianar/PSVWX
cuadrar/LPRSTVWX
cubrir/HIOQRTUVWY
cumular/PSVWX
dañar/PRSTVWX
decapitar/HPSVWX
decuplicar/PSTVWX
degradar/HLPRSTVWX
democratizar/HPSVWX
dentellar/PSVWX
depurar/HPSTVWX
desabarrancar/PSTVWX
desaconsejar/NPSTVWX
desafinar/HPSVWX
desainar/PSVWX
desalhajar/PSVWX
desamparar/PSTVWX
desaparear/PSVWX
desapuntalar/PSVWX
desarrumar/PSVWX
desatender/QTWX
desavahar/IPSVWX
desbaratar/IPSVWX
desborrar/PSVWX
descabalar/IPSVWX
descamisar/PSTVWX
descapullar/PSTVWX
descarrilar/IPSVWX
descender/ILWX
descifrar/PRSTVWX
descolgar/PRSTWX
desconceptuar/PSWX
descontar/PSWX
descreer/IWY
descuadrillar/PRSVWX
desdibujar/PSVWX
desembarazar/PRSTVWX
desembotar/PSVWX
desempachar/PSVWX
desencabalgar/PSVWX
desencapillar/PSVWX
desencofrar/PSTVWX
desenfrenar/IPRSTVWX
desengranar/PSVWX
desenmudecer/WX
desensillar/PSVWX
desenvainar/PSTVWX
desespaldar/PSVWX
desfamar/PSVWX
desgañifar/PRSVWX
desgastar/IPRSTVWX
desguarnir/VWX
desheredar/HIPRSTVWX
deshojar/PSVWX
desinfectar/LPRSTUVWX
desjuntar/IPSVWX
deslechuguillar/PSVWX
deslustrar/PSVWX
desmantecar/PSVWX
desmentir/QWY
desmotar/PSVWX
desnucar/PRSTVWX
desolazar/PSVWX
desosar/PSWX
despalillar/PSVWX
desparejar/PSVWX
despear/IPRSVWX
despepitar/PSVWX
despichar/PSVWX
desplantar/HPSVWX
despolvorear/PSVWX
despuntar/PRSTVWX
desrelingar/PSVWX
desteñir/OQWY
destorcer/OQRTWX
destripar/IPSTVWX
desurcar/PSVWX
desvencijar/PSVWX
desvolver/WY
devanar/PSTVWX
dializar/PSVWX
difundir/OQRTVWX
diptongar/HPSVWX
discriminar/HPSTVWX
disfrazar/PRSTVWX
disparar/PRSTVWX
divagar/HPSVWX
domesticar/HPSTVWX
drenar/PSVWX
eclesiastizar/PSVWX
ejemplarizar/PSVWX
eludir/QTVWX
emballenar/PSVWX
embarnizar/PSVWX
embeleñar/PSVWX
emboñigar/PSVWX
emborricar/PRSVWX
embravecer/IOQRTWX
embuchar/PSVWX
empañicar/PSVWX
empapar/IPRSTVWX
emparejar/IPRSTVWX
empellar/PSVWX
empergaminar/PSVWX
emplazar/IPRSTVWX
empotrerar/PSVWX
empurrar/PRSVWX
enamoricar/PRSVWX
encañamar/PSTVWX
encachar/PSVWX
encamarar/PSVWX
encanar/PRSVWX
encapazar/PSVWX
encaratular/PRSVWX
encascotar/PSVWX
encavar/PRSVWX
encernadar/PSVWX
enchuecar/PSVWX
encobijar/PSVWX
enconfitar/PSVWX
encorrear/PSVWX
encubrir/IOQRTVWY
endiñar/PSTVWX
enervar/HIPSVWX
enfermar/PRSVWX
enfroscar/PRSVWX
engaitar/PSVWX
engarrafar/PSVWX
engolondrinar/PSVWX
engranujar/PRSVWX
enguantar/PSVWX
enhacinar/PSVWX
enjardinar/PSVWX
enlagunar/PSVWX
enligar/PSVWX
enmallar/PRSVWX
enmatar/PRSVWX
enrabar/PSVWX
enredar/PRSTVWX
enrojar/PSVWX
ensalmar/PSVWX
enselvar/PSVWX
ensorberbecer/OQRTWX
entapujar/PSVWX
entiznar/PSTVWX
entrar/LPRSVWX
entrejuntar/PSVWX
entretallar/PSVWX
entronerar/PSVWX
enturar/PSVWX
envirar/PSVWX
esbarar/PSVWX
escamar/PRSTVWX
escardar/PSVWX
escolarizar/HPRSTVWX
esculcar/PSVWX
esmuir/TWY
espeluzar/PSVWX
espulgar/PRSTUVWX
estallar/PSTVWX
estomagar/PRSTUVWX
estuchar/PSTVWX
exclamar/HPSTVWX
existir/VWX
explicitar/PSTVWX
fabricar/HLPRSTUVWX
fanfarronear/PSVWX
fibrilar/HPSVWX
flexibilizar/PRSTVWX
forzar/PRSTUWX
fritar/PSVWX
galopear/PSVWX
gastar/PRSTUVWX
golosinar/PSVWX
gratificar/HPSTVWX
guipar/PSVWX
harbar/PSVWX
herbar/PSWX
hipnotizar/HPSVWX
hornaguear/PSVWX
hundir/IOQRTVWX
imitar/HPRSTVWX
impurificar/HPSVWX
incurrir/IVWX
informar/HLPRSTVWX
inquinar/PSVWX
integrar/HLPRSTUVWX
intrincar/NPRSTVWX
izar/PRSTVWX
jerarquizar/PSTVWX
justar/PSVWX
laminar/APSVWX
latir/LVWX
libar/HIPSVWX
litigar/HLPSVWX
lubrificar/HLPSVWX
macular/PRSVWX
malingrar/PSVWX
mandilar/PSVWX
maquilar/PSVWX
marrar/PSTVWX
maximizar/PRSTVWX
menguar/ILPSWX
metatizar/PSVWX
minutar/PSVWX
mofar/PRSTVWX
montear/PSVWX
motilar/PSVWX
murar/PSVWX
necear/PSVWX
notificar/HPRSTUVWX
obturar/HPSVWX
opinar/LPSVWX
osear/PSVWX
palatalizar/PSVWX
papear/PSVWX
parrandear/PSVWX
patrullar/PSVWX
pendejear/PSVWX
periquear/PSVWX
pervivir/VWX
pilotar/PSVWX
pirrar/PRSVWX
plantillar/PSVWX
polinizar/HPSVWX
pormenorizar/PSVWX
precisar/PRSTVWX
prelucir/WX
primear/PRSVWX
promanar/PSVWX
provenir/LWY
purear/PSVWX
quitar/HIPRSTUVWX
ralentizar/PSVWX
raspahilar/PSTWX
reajustar/PRSTUVWX
rebatir/IQTVWX
recadar/PSVWX
receptar/PRSTVWX
recodificar/HPRSTUVWX
recordar/HPRSTUWX
rediezmar/PSVWX
reescribir/OQRTUVWY
refrescar/ILPRSTUVWX
regular/HMPSTVWX
reiterar/HNPRSTUVWX
relingar/PSVWX
remolonear/PSVWX
repartir/HIOQRTUVWX
repoblar/HPRSTWX
requisar/PSVWX
resisar/PSTVWX
resquilar/PSVWX
retemblar/PSWX
retribuir/WY
reverdecer/LWX
rifar/PSVWX
romanzar/PSVWX
rucar/PSVWX
saborear/IPRSTVWX
salmar/PSVWX
sargentear/PSVWX
semicircular/PSVWX
sigilar/PSVWX
sintonizar/HPSTVWX
sobrecargar/PSTVWX
sobresaltar/PSVWX
sojuzgar/PSTVWX
sombrear/PSVWX
soplonear/PSVWX
subsanar/HPSTVWX
sumergir/IOQRTVWX
sustituir/OQWYZ
tamborear/PSVWX
tartamudear/PSVWX
temblequear/PSVWX
tergiversar/HPSTVWX
tironear/PSTVWX
torear/PSTVWX
tragonear/PSVWX
transigir/QTVWX
trapisondear/PSVWX
trasminar/PSVWX
trastejar/PSVWX
trillar/PSTVWX
trompillar/PSVWX
tundir/VWX
uniformar/PSVWX
vagamundear/PSVWX
vaticinar/PSTVWX
verguear/PSTVWX
visibilizar/PSTVWX
volver/OQRTUWY
zancajear/PSVWX
zascandilear/PSVWX
